Utah statutes.
41-12a-202.   Access to accident reports.

(1)  Accident reports and supplemental information as required under this chapter are protected and are for the confidential use of the department and other state, local, or federal government agencies and may be disclosed only as provided in Section 41-6a-404.

(2) (a)  Any person entitled to the disclosure of an accident report, as provided in Section 41-6a-404, may obtain a photocopy by paying the department a fee established under Section 63J-1-504.

(b)  These fees shall be deposited in the General Fund.

